Utah statutes.
57-1-40.   Reconveyance of trust deed or release of mortgage -- Procedures
-- Forms.
(1)  A title insurer or title agent may reconvey a trust deed or release a
mortgage in accordance with the provisions of Subsections (2) through (6) if:
(a)  the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has been fully paid
by the title insurer or title agent; or
(b)  the title insurer or title agent possesses satisfactory evidence of the
full payment of the obligation secured by a trust deed or mortgage.
(2)  A title insurer or title agent may reconvey a trust deed or release a
mortgage under Subsection (1) regardless of whether the title insurer or title
agent is named as a trustee under a trust deed or has the authority to release
a mortgage.
(3)  At the time the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage is paid
in full, or at any time thereafter, the title insurer or title agent shall
deliver a notice of intent to release or reconvey, as described in Subsection
(4), to the beneficiary, mortgagee, or servicer at:
(a)  the address specified in the trust deed or mortgage;
(b)  any address for the beneficiary or mortgagee specified in the last
recorded assignment of the trust deed or mortgage;
(c)  any address for the beneficiary, mortgagee, or servicer specified in a
request for notice recorded under Section 57-1-26; or
(d)  the address shown on any payoff statement received by the title insurer
or agent from the beneficiary, mortgagee, or servicer.
(4)  The notice of intent to release or reconvey shall contain the name of the
beneficiary or mortgagee and the servicer if loan payments on the trust deed
or mortgage are collected by a servicer, the name of the title insurer or
title agent, the date, and be substantially in the following form:
NOTICE OF INTENT TO RELEASE OR RECONVEY
Notice is hereby given to you as follows:
1.  This notice concerns the (trust deed or mortgage) described as follows:
(Trustor or Mortgagor): ___________________________________________
(Beneficiary or Mortgagee): _______________________________________
Recording information: ___________________________________________
Entry Number: __________________________________________________
Book Number: __________________________________________________
Page Number: ___________________________________________________
2.  The undersigned claims to have paid in full or possesses satisfactory
evidence of the full payment of the obligation secured by the trust deed or
mortgage described above.
3.  The undersigned will fully release the mortgage or reconvey the trust deed
described in this notice unless, within 60 days from the date stated on this
notice, the undersigned has received by certified mail a notice stating that
the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has not been paid in full
or that you otherwise object to the release of the mortgage or the
reconveyance of the trust deed.  Notice shall be mailed to the address stated
on this form.
(Signature of title insurer or title agent)
(Address of title insurer or title agent)
(5) (a)  If, within 60 days from the day on which the title insurer or title
agent delivered the notice of intent to release or reconvey in accordance with
Subsections (3) and (4), a reconveyance of trust deed or release of mortgage
is not recorded, and the beneficiary, mortgagee, or servicer does not send by
certified mail to the title insurer or title agent a notice that the
obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has not been paid in full or
that the beneficiary, mortgagee, or servicer objects to the release of the
mortgage or reconveyance of the trust deed, the title insurer or title agent
may execute, acknowledge, and record a reconveyance of a trust deed or release
of a mortgage.
(b)  A reconveyance of a trust deed under Subsection (5)(a) shall be in
substantially the following form:
RECONVEYANCE OF TRUST DEED
(Name of title insurer or title agent), a (title insurer or title agent)
authorized to conduct business in the state does hereby reconvey, without
warranty, the following trust property located in (name of county) County,
state of Utah, that is covered by a trust deed naming (name of trustor) as
trustor, and (name of beneficiary) as beneficiary and was recorded on (date)
in Book ________ at Page _________ as Entry Number _________: (insert a
description of the trust property.)
The undersigned title insurer or title agent certifies as follows:
1.  The undersigned title insurer or title agent has fully paid the obligation
secured by the trust deed or possesses satisfactory evidence of the full
payment of the obligation secured by the trust deed.
2.  In accordance with the requirements of Utah Code Annotated Subsections
57-1-40(3) and (4), the title insurer or title agent delivered to the
beneficiary or servicer, a notice of intent to release or reconvey and a copy
of the reconveyance.
3.  The trust deed has not been reconveyed and the title insurer or title
agent did not receive, within 60 days from the day on which the title insurer
or title agent delivered the notice of intent to release or reconvey, a notice
from the beneficiary or servicer sent by certified mail that the obligation
secured by the trust deed has not been paid in full or that the beneficiary or
servicer objects to the reconveyance of the trust deed.
___________________________________
__________________________________
(Notarization)  (Signature of title insurer or title agent)
(c)  A release of a mortgage under Subsection (5)(a) shall be in substantially
the following form:
RELEASE OF MORTGAGE
(Name of title insurer or title agent), a (title insurer or title agent)
authorized to conduct business in the state does hereby release the mortgage
on the following property located in (name of county) County, state of Utah,
that is covered by a mortgage naming (name of mortgagor) as mortgagor, and
(name of mortgagee) as mortgagee and was recorded on (date) in Book ________
at Page _________ as Entry Number _________: (insert a description of the
trust property.)
The undersigned title insurer or title agent certifies as follows:
1.  The undersigned title insurer or title agent has fully paid the obligation
secured by the mortgage or possesses satisfactory evidence of the full payment
of the obligation secured by the mortgage.
2.  In accordance with the requirements of Utah Code Annotated Subsections
57-1-40(3) and (4), the title insurer or title agent delivered to the
mortgagee or servicer a notice of intent to release or reconvey.
3.  The mortgage has not been released and the title insurer or title agent
did not receive, within 60 days from the day on which the title insurer or
title agent delivered the notice of intent to release or reconvey, a notice
from the mortgagee or servicer sent by certified mail that the obligation
secured by the mortgage has not been paid in full or that the mortgagee or
servicer objects to the release of the mortgage.
___________________________________
__________________________________
(Notarization)  (Signature of title insurer or title agent)
(d) (i)  A release of mortgage or reconveyance of trust deed that is executed
and notarized in accordance with Subsection (5)(b) or (c) is entitled to
recordation.
(ii) (A)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(d)(ii)(B), a reconveyance of a
trust deed or release of a mortgage that is recorded under Subsection
(5)(d)(i) is valid regardless of any deficiency in the release or reconveyance
procedure not disclosed in the release of mortgage or reconveyance of trust
deed.
(B)  If the title insurer's or title agent's signature on a release of
mortgage or reconveyance of trust deed recorded under Subsection (5)(d)(ii)(A)
is forged, the release of mortgage or reconveyance of trust deed is void.
(6)  A release of mortgage or reconveyance of trust deed under this section
does not, by itself, discharge any promissory note or other obligation that
was secured by the trust deed or mortgage at the time the trust deed was
reconveyed or the mortgage was released.
